Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.340

Legislative—Initiative—Repeal or amendment.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance initiated by petition, the city clerk shall write on the margin of the record thereof "ordinance by petition No. . . . .," or "ordinance by vote of the people," and it cannot be repealed or amended except by a vote of the people.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.340. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]